Ohio, session 136, HB319.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 3333.89 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 3333.89. The chancellor of higher education and each public medical college shall begin performing their duties under this section in the first full fiscal year that next begins after the effective date of this section. (A) As used in this section, "public medical school" means all of the following: (1) The Ohio state university college of medicine; (2) The university of Cincinnati college of medicine; (3) The Ohio university heritage college of osteopathic medicine; (4) The Wright state university Boonshoft school of medicine; (5) Northeast Ohio medical university; (6) The university of Toledo college of medicine and life sciences. (B) Beginning with the first full fiscal year that next begins after the effective date of this section, the chancellor of higher education annually shall use funds appropriated by the general assembly to distribute a clinical teaching subsidy to public medical schools to support clinical instruction and the education of physicians in this state. The chancellor shall distribute the subsidy to public medical schools using a formula that does both of the following: (1) Allocates ninety per cent of the subsidy proportionally among the schools based on the number of full-time equivalent students enrolled in clinical training years; (2) Allocates ten per cent of the subsidy among the schools based on whether a school met performance metrics that reflect the school's contribution to the development and retention of physicians in this state, which may include the following: (a) The percentage of students who are residents of this state; (b) The percentage of graduates entering medical residency programs in this state; (c) The percentage of graduates practicing medicine in this state three years after graduating. (C) The chancellor annually shall publish all of the following: (1) The number of qualifying full-time equivalent students enrolled in each public medical school; (2) The performance metrics included in the formula to distribute the clinical teaching subsidy, and the performance of each public medical school on those metrics; (3) The final subsidy allocation to each public medical school. (D)(1) Each public medical school annually shall report to the chancellor, in a form and manner prescribed by the chancellor, all of the following: (a) How the public medical school used its clinical teaching subsidy funds; (b) Clinical training sites and rotation placements; (c) Student residency match outcomes; (d) Workforce retention statistics. (2) The chancellor shall review reports submitted under division (D) of this section to ensure that each public medical school is using its portion of the clinical teaching subsidy to provide clinical instruction and educate physicians. (E) The chancellor shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to administer and enforce this section. The chancellor shall include all of the following in the rules: (1) A definition of clinical year that is consistent with the definition used when determining the state share of instruction appropriation for professional-level medical students in the main operating appropriations act; (2) A definition of qualifying full-time equivalent student; (3) Data submission procedures; (4) Authorized performance metrics and data sources. Section 2. This act shall be known as the Clinical Teaching Subsidy Reform Act.